Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.280

Actions to avoid law null and void.

Any action taken by any person accused or convicted of a crime, whether by way of execution of a power of attorney, creation of corporate entities or otherwise, to defeat the purpose of *this act shall be null and void as against the public policy of this state.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 20.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this act," see note following RCW 7.68.250.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.